Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62Q.76, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of commerce. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [62Q.761] DENTAL LOSS RATIO. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Loss ratio calculation. new text end new text begin Dental loss ratio is equal to the total claims paid by a dental organization divided by gross premium revenue received by the dental organization for providing dental care services to enrollees. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Rebate. new text end new text begin (a) A dental organization's dental loss ratio calculated under subdivision 1 must be at least 85 percent. new text end new text begin (b) A dental organization that does not meet the dental loss ratio under paragraph (a) must provide remediation to the dental organization's enrollees. Remediation may be achieved by issuing a direct rebate to enrollees, an increase in dental plan benefit limits for the following year, or other methods determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Rate review and approval. new text end new text begin A dental organization must file with the commissioner proposed changes to premium rates that are effective during the next calendar year. The commissioner may disapprove a proposed rate change using the standards under section 62A.02, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) By March 1, 2027, a dental organization must submit a report to the commissioner showing the dental organization's dental loss ratio for each year of the prior three calendar years and an actuarial memorandum disclosing the financial information that was used to calculate the dental loss ratio. new text end new text begin (b) By March 1, 2028, and each year thereafter, a dental organization must submit a report to the commissioner showing its dental loss ratio for the previous calendar year, an actuarial memorandum disclosing the financial information that was used to calculate the dental loss ratio, a detailed summary of any proposed rate change filed under subdivision 3, and any other information determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must publish on the Department of Commerce's website an annual report containing the information submitted by a dental organization under paragraphs (a) and (b). The information must be published in a manner that allows the public to search and compare the dental loss ratios of all dental organizations. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin (a) Subdivision 1 is effective January 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) Subdivision 2 is effective January 1, 2028. new text end new text begin (c) Subdivisions 3 and 4 are effective January 1, 2027. new text end